Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.830

Medical information exempt from disclosure—Exceptions.

Medical information contained in files and records of members of retirement plans administered by the department of retirement systems or the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board, under the provisions of this title, are confidential and exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW. However:

(1) Representatives of an applicant may review an application file or receive specific information from an application file with the signed authorization of the applicant.

(2) Health care providers treating or examining applicants claiming disability retirement benefits under this title, or physicians giving medical advice to the department of retirement systems regarding any application, may, at the discretion of the department of retirement systems, inspect the application files and records of applicants.

(3) At the discretion of the department of retirement systems, persons rendering assistance to the department at any stage of the proceedings on any matter pertaining to the administration of this title may inspect the health information contained in application files and records of applicants.

[ 2020 c 323 s 1.]